Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4424.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin SHERBURNE COUNTY; TAXES AUTHORIZED.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Sales and use tax authorization. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, sections 297A.99, subdivision 2, paragraph (b); 477A.016; or any other law or ordinance, and if approved by the voters at an election as required under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.99, subdivision 3, Sherburne County may impose by ordinance a sales and use tax of one-quarter percent for the purposes specified in subdivision 2. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the provisions of Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.99, govern the imposition, administration, collection, and enforcement of the tax authorized under this subdivision. The tax authorized under this subdivision is in addition to any local sales and use tax imposed under any other special law. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Use of sales and use tax revenues. new text end new text begin The revenues derived from the tax authorized under subdivision 1 must be used by the county to pay the costs of collecting and administering the tax and to finance up to $75,000,000, plus associated bonding costs, for a law enforcement center, which includes a jail. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Bonding authority. new text end new text begin (a) The county may issue bonds under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 475, to finance all or a portion of the costs of the project authorized in subdivision 2 and approved by voters as required under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.99, subdivision 3, paragraph (a). The aggregate principal amount of bonds issued under this subdivision may not exceed $75,000,000, plus an amount applied to the payment of the costs of issuing the bonds. The bonds may be paid from or secured by any money available to the county, including the tax authorized under subdivision 1. The issuance of bonds under this subdivision is not subject to Minnesota Statutes, sections 275.60 and 275.61. new text end new text begin (b) The bonds are not included in computing any debt limitation applicable to the county. Any levy of taxes under Minnesota Statutes, section 475.61, to pay principal of and interest on the bonds is not subject to any levy limitation. A separate election to approve the bonds under Minnesota Statutes, section 475.58, is not required. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Termination of taxes. new text end new text begin Subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.99, subdivision 12, the tax authorized under subdivision 1 expires at the earlier of (1) 20 years after the tax is first imposed, or (2) when the city council determines that the amount received from the tax is sufficient to pay for the project costs authorized under subdivision 2 if approved by voters as required under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.99, subdivision 3, paragraph (a), plus an amount sufficient to pay the costs related to issuance of any bonds authorized under subdivision 3, including interest on the bonds. Except as otherwise provided in Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.99, subdivision 3, paragraph (f), any money remaining after payment of the allowed costs due to the timing of the termination of the tax under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.99, subdivision 12, must be placed in the general fund of the city. The tax authorized under subdivision 1 may expire at an earlier time if the city so determines by ordinance. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day after the governing body of Sherburne County and its chief clerical officer comply with Minnesota Statutes, section 645.021, subdivisions 2 and 3. new text end